District of Columbia statutes.
31-3163

Application.

This chapter shall apply to policies and certificates of insurance that are health benefit plans as defined under § 31-3271(4) that are issued 90 days after April 8, 2011. This chapter shall not apply to short-term limited duration health benefit plans.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 304, 58 DCR 896